HunspellVBATests/lang/tk-TM.aff
FLAG num
SFX 5992 N 1360
SFX 5992 0 mek .
SFX 5992 0 megiň .
SFX 5992 0 mäge .
SFX 5992 0 megi .
SFX 5992 0 mekde .
SFX 5992 0 mekden .
SFX 5992 0 mezlik .
SFX 5992 0 mezligiň .
SFX 5992 0 mezlige .
SFX 5992 0 mezligi .
SFX 5992 0 mezlikde .
SFX 5992 0 mezlikden .
SFX 5992 0 megindäki .
SFX 5992 0 megindäkiniň .
SFX 5992 0 megindäkä .
SFX 5992 0 megindäkini .
SFX 5992 0 megindäkide .
SFX 5992 0 megindäkiden .
SFX 5992 iz zeýin .
SFX 5992 il leýin .
SFX 5992 in neýin .
SFX 5992 ir reýin .
SFX 5992 is seýin .
SFX 5992 iş şeýin .
SFX 5992 0 mäýin .
SFX 5992 0 me .
SFX 5992 0 sin .
SFX 5992 0 mesin .
SFX 5992 iz zeliň .
SFX 5992 il leliň .
SFX 5992 in neliň .
SFX 5992 ir reliň .
SFX 5992 is seliň .
SFX 5992 iş şeliň .
SFX 5992 0 mäliň .
SFX 5992 iz ziň .
SFX 5992 il liň .
SFX 5992 in niň .
SFX 5992 ir riň .
SFX 5992 is siň .
SFX 5992 iş şiň .
SFX 5992 0 mäň .
SFX 5992 0 sinler .
SFX 5992 0 mesinler .
SFX 5992 0 äýeýin .
SFX 5992 0 mäýeýin .
SFX 5992 0 äý .
SFX 5992 0 mäý .
SFX 5992 0 äýsin .
SFX 5992 0 mäýsin .
SFX 5992 0 äýeliň .
SFX 5992 0 mäýeliň .
SFX 5992 0 äýiň .
SFX 5992 0 mäýiň .
SFX 5992 0 äýsinler .
SFX 5992 0 mäýsinler .
SFX 5992 0 äýin .
SFX 5992 0 mäýin .
SFX 5992 0 äýeli .
SFX 5992 0 mäýeli .
SFX 5992 0 äýiň .
SFX 5992 0 mäýiň .
SFX 5992 0 äýsinler .
SFX 5992 0 mäýsinler .
SFX 5992 0 mezinden .
SFX 5992 0 megim .
SFX 5992 0 mezligim .
SFX 5992 0 megimiň .
SFX 5992 0 mezligimiň .
SFX 5992 0 megime .
SFX 5992 0 mezligime .
SFX 5992 0 megimi .
SFX 5992 0 mezligimi .
SFX 5992 0 megimde .
SFX 5992 0 mezligimde .
SFX 5992 0 megimden .
SFX 5992 0 mezligimden .
SFX 5992 0 megiň .
SFX 5992 0 mezligiň .
SFX 5992 0 megiňe .
SFX 5992 0 mezligiňe .
SFX 5992 0 megiňi .
SFX 5992 0 mezligiňi .
SFX 5992 0 megiňde .
SFX 5992 0 mezligiňde .
SFX 5992 0 megiňden .
SFX 5992 0 mezligiňden .
SFX 5992 0 megi .
SFX 5992 0 mezligi .
SFX 5992 0 meginiň .
SFX 5992 0 mezliginiň .
SFX 5992 0 megine .
SFX 5992 0 mezligine .
SFX 5992 0 megini .
SFX 5992 0 mezligini .
SFX 5992 0 meginde .
SFX 5992 0 mezliginde .
SFX 5992 0 meginden .
SFX 5992 0 mezliginden .
SFX 5992 0 megimiz .
SFX 5992 0 mezligimiz .
SFX 5992 0 megimiziň .
SFX 5992 0 mezligimiziň .
SFX 5992 0 megimize .
SFX 5992 0 mezligimize .
SFX 5992 0 megimizi .
SFX 5992 0 mezligimizi .
SFX 5992 0 megimizde .
SFX 5992 0 mezligimizde .
SFX 5992 0 megimizden .
SFX 5992 0 mezligimizden .
SFX 5992 0 megiňiz .
SFX 5992 0 mezligiňiz .
SFX 5992 0 megiňiziň .
SFX 5992 0 mezligiňiziň .
SFX 5992 0 megiňize .
SFX 5992 0 mezligiňize .
SFX 5992 0 megiňizi .
SFX 5992 0 mezligiňizi .
SFX 5992 0 megiňizde .
SFX 5992 0 mezligiňizde .
SFX 5992 0 megiňizden .
SFX 5992 0 mezligiňizden .
SFX 5992 0 mekleri .
SFX 5992 0 mezlikleri .
SFX 5992 0 mekleriniň .
SFX 5992 0 mezlikleriniň .
SFX 5992 0 meklerize .
SFX 5992 0 mezliklerine .
SFX 5992 0 meklerini .
SFX 5992 0 mezliklerini .
SFX 5992 0 meklerinde .
SFX 5992 0 mezliklerinde .
SFX 5992 0 meklerinden .
SFX 5992 0 mezliklerinden .
SFX 5992 0 melidirin .
SFX 5992 0 melisiň .
SFX 5992 0 melidir .
SFX 5992 0 melidiris .
SFX 5992 0 melisiňiz .
SFX 5992 0 melidirler .
SFX 5992 0 melidigi .
SFX 5992 0 melidiginiň .
SFX 5992 0 melidigine .
SFX 5992 0 melidigini .
SFX 5992 0 melidiginde .
SFX 5992 0 melidiginden .
SFX 5992 0 meli .
SFX 5992 0 jekdigim .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdigim .
SFX 5992 0 jekdigimiň .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdigimiň .
SFX 5992 0 jekdigime .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdigime .
SFX 5992 0 jekdigimi .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdigimi .
SFX 5992 0 jekdigimde .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdigimde .
SFX 5992 0 jekdigimden .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdigimden .
SFX 5992 0 jekdigiň .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdigiň .
SFX 5992 0 jekdigiň .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdigiň .
SFX 5992 0 jekdigiňe .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdigiňe .
SFX 5992 0 jekdigiňi .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdigiňi .
SFX 5992 0 jekdigiňde .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdigiňde .
SFX 5992 0 jekdigiňden .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdigiňden .
SFX 5992 0 jekdigi .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdigi .
SFX 5992 0 jekdiginiň .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdiginiň .
SFX 5992 0 jekdigine .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdigine .
SFX 5992 0 jekdigini .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdigini .
SFX 5992 0 jekdiginde .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdiginde .
SFX 5992 0 jekdiginden .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdiginden .
SFX 5992 0 jekdigimiz .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdigimiz .
SFX 5992 0 jekdigimiziň .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdigimiziň .
SFX 5992 0 jekdigimize .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdigimize .
SFX 5992 0 jekdigimizi .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdigimizi .
SFX 5992 0 jekdigimizde .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdigimizde .
SFX 5992 0 jekdigimizden .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdigimizden .
SFX 5992 0 jekdigiňiz .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdigiňiz .
SFX 5992 0 jekdigiňiziň .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdigiňiziň .
SFX 5992 0 jekdigiňize .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdigiňize .
SFX 5992 0 jekdigiňizi .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdigiňizi .
SFX 5992 0 jekdigiňizde .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdigiňizde .
SFX 5992 0 jekdigiňizden .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdigiňizden .
SFX 5992 0 jekdikleri .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdikleri .
SFX 5992 0 jekdikleriniň .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdikleriniň .
SFX 5992 0 jekdiklerine .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdiklerine .
SFX 5992 0 jekdiklerini .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdiklerini .
SFX 5992 0 jekdiklerinde .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdiklerinde .
SFX 5992 0 jekdiklerinden .
SFX 5992 0 mejekdiklerinden .
SFX 5992 0 meýänligiňiz .
SFX 5992 0 meýänligiňiziň .
SFX 5992 0 meýänligiňize .
SFX 5992 0 meýänligiňizi .
SFX 5992 0 meýänligiňizde .
SFX 5992 0 meýänligiňizden .
SFX 5992 iz zen .
SFX 5992 il len .
SFX 5992 in nen .
SFX 5992 ir ren .
SFX 5992 is sen .
SFX 5992 iş şen .
SFX 5992 0 medik .
SFX 5992 0 ýän .
SFX 5992 0 meýän .
SFX 5992 0 jek .
SFX 5992 0 mejek .
SFX 5992 0 mänkäm .
SFX 5992 0 mänkäň .
SFX 5992 0 mänkä .
SFX 5992 0 mänkäk .
SFX 5992 0 mänkäňiz .
SFX 5992 0 mänkäler .
SFX 5992 0 sem .
SFX 5992 0 mesem .
SFX 5992 0 seň .
SFX 5992 0 meseň .
SFX 5992 0 se .
SFX 5992 0 mese .
SFX 5992 0 sek .
SFX 5992 0 mesek .
SFX 5992 0 seňiz .
SFX 5992 0 meseňiz .
SFX 5992 0 seler .
SFX 5992 0 meseler .
SFX 5992 0 äýsem .
SFX 5992 0 mäýsem .
SFX 5992 0 äýseň .
SFX 5992 0 mäýseň .
SFX 5992 0 äýse .
SFX 5992 0 mäýse .
SFX 5992 0 äýsek .
SFX 5992 0 mäýsek .
SFX 5992 0 äýseňiz .
SFX 5992 0 mäýseňiz .
SFX 5992 0 äýseler .
SFX 5992 0 mäýseler .
SFX 5992 0 ýärin .
SFX 5992 0 meýärin .
SFX 5992 0 ýärsiň .
SFX 5992 0 meýärsiň .
SFX 5992 0 ýär .
SFX 5992 0 meýär .
SFX 5992 0 ýäris .
SFX 5992 0 meýäris .
SFX 5992 0 ýärsiňiz.
SFX 5992 0 meýärsiňiz.
SFX 5992 0 ýärler .
SFX 5992 0 meýärler .
SFX 5992 0 äýerin .
SFX 5992 0 mäýerin .
SFX 5992 0 äýersiň .
SFX 5992 0 mäýersiň .
SFX 5992 0 äýer .
SFX 5992 0 mäýer .
SFX 5992 0 äýeris .
SFX 5992 0 mäýeris .
SFX 5992 0 äýersiňiz.
SFX 5992 0 mäýersiňiz.
SFX 5992 0 äýerler .
SFX 5992 0 mäýerler .
SFX 5992 0 dim .
SFX 5992 0 medim .
SFX 5992 0 diň .
SFX 5992 0 mediň .
SFX 5992 0 di .
SFX 5992 0 medi .
SFX 5992 0 dik .
SFX 5992 0 medik .
SFX 5992 0 diňiz .
SFX 5992 0 mediňiz .
SFX 5992 0 diler .
SFX 5992 0 mediler .
SFX 5992 0 äýdim .
SFX 5992 0 äýdiň .
SFX 5992 0 äýdi .
SFX 5992 0 äýdik .
SFX 5992 0 äýdiňiz .
SFX 5992 0 äýdiler .
SFX 5992 iz zerin .
SFX 5992 il lerin .
SFX 5992 in nerin .
SFX 5992 ir rerin .
SFX 5992 is serin .
SFX 5992 iş şerin .
SFX 5992 0 merin .
SFX 5992 iz zersiň .
SFX 5992 il lersiň .
SFX 5992 in nersiň .
SFX 5992 ir rersiň .
SFX 5992 is sersiň .
SFX 5992 iş şersiň .
SFX 5992 0 mersiň .
SFX 5992 iz zer .
SFX 5992 il ler .
SFX 5992 in ner .
SFX 5992 ir rer .
SFX 5992 is ser .
SFX 5992 iş şer .
SFX 5992 0 mez .
SFX 5992 iz zeris .
SFX 5992 il leris .
SFX 5992 in neris .
SFX 5992 ir reris .
SFX 5992 is seris .
SFX 5992 iş şeris .
SFX 5992 0 meris .
SFX 5992 iz zersiňiz .
SFX 5992 il lersiňiz .
SFX 5992 in nersiňiz .
SFX 5992 ir rersiňiz .
SFX 5992 is sersiňiz .
SFX 5992 iş şersiňiz .
SFX 5992 0 mersiňiz .
SFX 5992 iz zerler .
SFX 5992 il lerler .
SFX 5992 in nerler .
SFX 5992 ir rerler .
SFX 5992 is serler .
SFX 5992 iş şerler .
SFX 5992 0 mezler .
SFX 5992 0 mäň .
SFX 5992 0 meziň .
SFX 5992 0 meze .
SFX 5992 0 mezi .
SFX 5992 0 mezde .
SFX 5992 0 mezden .
SFX 5992 0 mändigi .
SFX 5992 0 mändiginiň .
SFX 5992 0 mändigine .
SFX 5992 0 mändigini .
SFX 5992 0 mändiginde .
SFX 5992 0 mändiginden .
SFX 5992 0 mänligi .
