HunspellVBATests/lang/tk-TM.dic
bilin/5992
biliş/5992
çigiş/5992
degir/5992
degiş/5992
dilin/5992
diliş/5992
diňiş/5992
diýiş/5992
egir/5992
egis/5992
eriş/5992
äberiş/5992
gelin/5992
geliş/5992
gemir/5992
gerin/5992
geýdiriliş/5992
geýin/5992
girreliş/5992
güýmeniş/5992
heňkiriş/5992
hümerleniş/5992
hüwjeriş/5992
iýiş/5992
jikgeriş/5992
lägiriş/5992
mürreliş/5992
öjügiş/5992
ölçeriş/5992
pökgeriş/5992
siňir/5992
siňiş/5992
sömeliş/5992
söýeniş/5992
tiriş/5992
üşeriliş/5992
ýemir/5992
ýitiril/5992
